Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1413
Officers and employees; employment.

The dock board shall have power to employ such harbor masters, managers, assistants, attorneys, engineers, employees, clerks, workmen, and laborers as may be necessary in the efficient and economical performance of the work authorized by sections 13-1401 to 13-1417. All officers, places, and employment in the permanent service of the board shall be provided for by resolution duly passed by the board and recorded in the board's book of rules and regulations, and a certified copy thereof shall be transmitted to the county clerk or clerk of the municipality, as the case may be, as provided for other rules and regulations of the board.

Laws 1937, c. 37, § 3, p. 171;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2003;

R.S.1943, § 18-712;

Laws 1967, c. 84, § 10, p. 265;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-712.